Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2835.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 23, chapter 8, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-1308, to read: START_STATUTE23-1308. Labor organization; paycheck deduction; prohibition A labor organization in this state may not deduct labor organization membership dues directly from an employee's paycheck. END_STATUTE